Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.0315

Raffles—No license required, when.

Bona fide charitable or bona fide nonprofit organizations organized primarily for purposes other than the conduct of raffles, are hereby authorized to conduct raffles without obtaining a license to do so from the commission when such raffles are held in accordance with all other requirements of this chapter, other applicable laws, and rules of the commission; when gross revenues from all such raffles held by the organization during the calendar year do not exceed five thousand dollars; and when tickets to such raffles are sold only to, and winners are determined only from among, the regular members of the organization conducting the raffle. The organization may provide unopened containers of beverages containing alcohol as raffle prizes if the appropriate permit has been obtained from the *liquor control board: PROVIDED, That raffles that exceed five thousand dollars may also be conducted pursuant to the provisions of this section if the organization obtains a license from the commission: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the term members for this purpose shall mean only those persons who have become members prior to the commencement of the raffle and whose qualification for membership was not dependent upon, or in any way related to, the purchase of a ticket, or tickets, for such raffles.

[ 2012 c 131 s 1; 1991 c 192 s 4; 1987 c 4 s 27. Formerly RCW 9.46.030(2).]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The "state liquor control board" was renamed the "state liquor and cannabis board" by 2015 c 70 s 3.